California, session 20252026, SB885.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) The people of the State of California are best served when regulations with significant statewide economic or social impact are subject to clear legislative oversight. Regulations, known as major regulations, that impose substantial costs on California residents, businesses, and local governments require a level of democratic accountability that exceeds the current administrative process.(b) While the Administrative Procedure Act provides important safeguards, including public comment and standardized regulatory impact analyses, the adoption of major regulations often results in significant policy decisions that are, in effect, legislative in nature. These decisions should not be made solely within the executive branch without explicit direction from the Legislature.(c) It is therefore the intent of the Legislature to ensure that no major regulation may be finally adopted unless the regulation has been reviewed by the Department of Finance, submitted to the Legislature with a complete analysis of its impacts, and expressly authorized by statute.(d) This act is not intended to impede the state’s ability to respond to genuine and unforeseen emergencies. To that end, this act provides a limited and time-bound process for emergency adoption and readoption of major regulations, while preserving the requirement for legislative authorization for any long-term regulatory action.SEC. 2. Section 11355 is added to the Government Code, to read:11355. (a)This section shall be known, and may be cited as, the Restoring Accountability Act.(a) Notwithstanding any other law, on or after January 1, 2027, a state agency shall not take final action to adopt a major regulation until all of the requirements of subdivision (b) have been met.(b) (1) A state agency proposing to adopt a major regulation shall comply with the requirements of Article 5 (commencing with Section 11346).(2) After the state agency prepares a standardized regulatory impact analysis and submits the analysis to the Department of Finance for comment as required by Section 11346.3, the state agency shall submit a proposal to the Legislature recommending legislation to authorize the adoption of the major regulation.(3) The state agency shall not take final action to adopt the major regulation unless the Legislature has enacted a law expressly authorizing the state agency to adopt that major regulation.(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), a state agency may adopt an emergency regulation that is a major regulation, subject to the following requirements:(1) The state agency shall make a finding that the adoption of the regulation is necessary to address an emergency.(2) The emergency regulation shall be adopted in accordance with subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, of Section 11346.1.(3) (A) The emergency regulation shall not remain in effect more than 180 days.(B) (i) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), the state agency may readopt, for a period not to exceed 90 days, an emergency regulation that is the same or substantially equivalent to the emergency regulation previously adopted by that state agency if the state agency does both of the following:(I) Prepares a standardized regulatory impact analysis and submits the analysis to the Department of Finance for comment as provided in Section 11346.3.(II) Submits a proposal to the Legislature recommending legislation to authorize the adoption of the major regulation.(ii) A state agency may only readopt an emergency regulation pursuant to this subparagraph two times.(d) A proposal submitted to the Legislature pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795.